Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7002
Purpose and intent.

The Health Care Professional Credentialing Verification Act requires a health carrier to establish a comprehensive health care professional credentialing verification program to ensure that its participating health care professionals meet specific minimum standards of professional qualification. The standards set out in the act address the initial credentialing verification and subsequent recredentialing process.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 27.